Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8003
Industrial hygiene, defined.

For purposes of the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act, industrial hygiene means the science and practice devoted to the anticipation, recognition, evaluation, and specification of controls of environmental factors, stressors, physical hazards, and chemical exposures associated with work and work operations that may cause sickness, impaired health and well-being, or significant discomfort among workers and the general community.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 3.